Washington statutes.
RCW 25.10.061

Name.

The name of a limited partnership must comply with the provisions of Article 3 of chapter 23.95 RCW.

[ 2015 c 176 s 6102; 2009 c 188 s 108.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.